West Virginia, session 2026, HB4225.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5B. Authorization for OFFICE OF INSPECTOR GENERAL to promulgate legislative rules. §64- 5B - 1. Office of Inspector General. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §16B-10-11 of this code, relating to the Office of Inspector General (delegation of medication administration and health maintenance tasks to approved medication assistive personnel, 71 CSR 17), is authorized with the following amendment:On page 3, subsection 2.14 by striking the period inserting in lieu thereof a comma and the following, "this includes a dial-up insulin pen."And,On page 13, subsection 9.2, following the period by inserting the following "Selecting or setting the amount on a dial-up insulin pen to an amount prescribed is ministerial in nature and is not deemed an exercise of a clinical or judgment decision-making."